vi: Nhà và vườn > Thiết bị điện gia dụng > Phụ kiện quạt: Thanh Nối & Thanh Mở Rộng Quạt Trần; Cánh Quạt; Bộ Dụng Cụ Gắn & Giá Đỡ Quạt; Dây Kéo & Công Tắc Quạt; Điều Khiển Quạt; Bộ hệ thống chiếu sáng
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kodinkoneiden lisätarvikkeet > Tuuletintarvikkeet: Kattotuulettimien akselit ja jatkokappaleet; Tuulettimien lavat; Tuulettimien asennussarjat ja kiinnikkeet; Tuulettimen ketjukytkimet ja katkaisimet; Tuulettimen kaukosäätimet; Valaistusjärjestelmäsetit
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Príslušenstvo k domácim spotrebičom > Príslušenstvo pre ventilátory: Tyče a predlžovacie tyče pre stropné ventilátory; Čepele ventilátora; Montážne súpravy a konzoly pre ventilátory; Ťahové spínače a spínače ventilátorov; Diaľkové ovládače ventilátora; Súpravy osvetľovacích systémov
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartásigép-kiegészítők > Ventilátorkiegészítők: Mennyezeti ventilátor leszorító és hosszabbító rudak; Ventilátorlapátok; Ventilátor rögzítőkészletek és konzolok; Ventilátorhúzó láncok és kapcsolók; Ventilátor távirányítók; Világításirendszer-készletek
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家电配件 > 风扇配件: 吊扇吊杆/延长杆; 风扇叶片; 风扇安装套件/支架; 风扇拉线/开关; 风扇遥控器; 照明系统套件
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์เครื่องใช้ในบ้าน > อุปกรณ์พัดลม: ก้านต่อพัดลมเพดานและก้านต่อขยาย; ใบพัดลม; ชุดติดตั้งและขายึดพัดลม; โซ่ดึงและสวิตช์พัดลม; รีโมตคอนโทรลพัดลม; ชุดระบบไฟส่องสว่าง
es: Casa y jardín > Accesorios para electrodomésticos > Accesorios para ventiladores: Tubos bajantes y extensiones para ventiladores de techo; Aspas de ventilador; Kits y soportes de montaje para ventiladores; Cadenas y juegos de tiradores para ventiladores; Controles remotos para ventiladores; Kits de sistemas de iluminación
en: Home & Garden > Household Appliance Accessories > Fan Accessories: Ceiling Fan Downrods & Extension Rods; Fan Blades; Fan Mounting Kits & Brackets; Fan Pull Chains & Switches; Fan Remote Controls; Lighting System Kits
cs: Dům a zahrada > Domácí spotřebiče – příslušenství > Větráky – příslušenství: Svislé tyče a prodlužovací tyče pro stropní ventilátory; Lopatky ventilátoru; Montážní sady a konzoly pro ventilátory; Řetízky a spínače ventilátorů; Dálková ovládání větráků; Sady osvětlovacích systémů
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Acessórios de eletrodomésticos > Acessórios de ventoinha: Varões de extensão e varões de fixação para ventiladores de teto; Pás do ventilador; Kit de montagem e suportes para ventilador; Correntes e interruptores para ventilador; Comandos para ventoinha; Kits de sistema de iluminação
nb: Hjem og hage > Tilbehør til husholdningsapparater > Tilbehør til vifter: Forlengere og stenger til takvifter; Vifteblader; Viftemonteringssett og -braketter; Viftekjeder og brytere; Vifte-fjernkontroller; Belysningssystemsett
pl: Dom i ogród > Akcesoria do sprzętu AGD > Akcesoria do wentylatorów: Przedłużki i rurki do wentylatorów sufitowych; Łopatki wentylatora; Zestawy montażowe i uchwyty do wentylatorów; Łańcuchy i przełączniki do wentylatorów; Piloty do wentylatorów; Zestawy systemów oświetleniowych
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Pribor za kućanske aparate > Pribor za ventilatore: Pričvrsne i produžne šipke za stropne ventilatore; Lopatice ventilatora; Kompleti i nosači za montažu ventilatora; Lanci i prekidači za pokretanje ventilatora; Daljinski upravljači za ventilatore; Kompleti sustava rasvjete
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsapparater – tilbehør > Blæser – tilbehør: Skafter og forlængelsesstænger til loftventilatorer; Blade til ventilatorer; Monteringssæt og -beslag til ventilatorer; Trækkæder og -afbrydere til ventilatorer; Fjernbetjeninger til ventilatorer; Belysningssystemsæt
fr: Maison et jardin > Accessoires pour appareils électroménagers > Accessoires pour ventilateurs: Tiges de suspension et rallonges pour ventilateurs de plafond; Pales de ventilateur; Kit de montage et supports pour ventilateur; Chaînettes et interrupteurs pour ventilateurs; Télécommandes pour ventilateurs; Kits de système d’éclairage
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Αξεσουάρ οικιακών συσκευών > Αξεσουάρ ανεμιστήρα: Ράβδοι ανάρτησης & προέκτασης ανεμιστήρων οροφής; Πτερύγια ανεμιστήρων; Κιτ & βάσεις στήριξης ανεμιστήρων; Αλυσίδες έλξης & διακόπτες ανεμιστήρων; Τηλεχειριστήρια ανεμιστήρων; Κιτ συστήματος φωτισμού
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Аксесоари за домакински уреди > Аксесоари за вентилатори: Удължителни пръти и щанги за таванни вентилатори; Лопатки за вентилатор; Монтажни комплекти и скоби за вентилатор; Вериги и контакти за вентилатори; Дистанционни управления за вентилатори; Комплекти за осветителни системи
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Aleti Aksesuarları > Vantilatör Aksesuarları: Tavan Vantilatörü Uzatma Boruları; Vantilatör Pervaneleri; Vantilatör Montaj Kitleri ve Braketleri; Vantilatör Çekme Zincirleri ve Anahtarları; Vantilatör Uzaktan Kumandaları; Aydınlatma Sistemi Kitleri
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 가전 제품 부대용품 > 선풍기 부대용품: 천장 선풍기 연장 봉; 선풍기 날개; 선풍기 설치 키트 및 브래킷; 선풍기 당김줄 및 스위치; 선풍기 리모컨; 조명 시스템 세트
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dodatki za gospodinjske aparate > Dodatki za ventilatorje: Stropni ventilatorji – podaljški in obesni drogovi; Lopatice ventilatorja; Kompleti in nosilci za montažo ventilatorjev; Verižice in stikala za ventilatorje; Daljinski upravljalniki za ventilatorje; Kompleti za sistem razsvetljave
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 家電関連用品 > 扇風機・ファン関連用品: シーリングファン用ダウンロッド・延長ロッド; ファンブレード; ファン取り付けキット・ブラケット; ファン用プルチェーン・スイッチ; 扇風機用リモコン; 照明システムキット
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Accesorii pentru electrocasnice > Accesorii pentru ventilatoare: Tije de susținere și tije de extensie pentru ventilatoare de tavan; Pale de ventilator; Kit de montare pentru ventilator și suporturi; Lanțuri și întrerupătoare pentru ventilatoare; Telecomenzi pentru ventilatoare; Seturi de sisteme de iluminat
ru: Дом и сад > Аксессуары для бытовой техники > Аксессуары для вентиляторов: Штанги и удлинители для потолочных вентиляторов; Лопасти вентилятора; Набор для монтажа вентилятора и кронштейны; Цепочки и выключатели для вентиляторов; Пульты дистанционного управления для вентиляторов; Комплекты системы освещения
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Acessórios para eletrodomésticos > Acessórios para ventilador: Hastes de extensão e de fixação para ventiladores de teto; Pás de ventilador; Kits e suportes de montagem para ventiladores; Correntes e interruptores de ventilador; Controles remotos para ventiladores; Kits de sistema de iluminação
it: Casa e giardino > Accessori elettrodomestici > Accessori ventola: Aste di prolunga e tiranti per ventilatori da soffitto; Pale per ventilatori; Kit di montaggio ventola e staffe; Catene di trazione e interruttori per ventilatori; Telecomandi per ventilatori; Kit del sistema di illuminazione
nl: Huis en tuin > Accessoires voor huishoudelijke apparaten > Accessoires voor ventilatoren: Verlengstangen en verlengstukken voor plafondventilatoren; Ventilatorbladen; Montagesets en beugels voor ventilatoren; Ventilatortrekkoorden en -schakelaars; Afstandsbedieningen voor ventilatoren; Verlichtingssysteemkits
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 家用電器配件 > 風扇配件: 吊扇吊桿與延長桿; 風扇葉片; 風扇安裝工具包與支架; 風扇拉繩開關; 電風扇遙控器; 照明系統組
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Buitinės technikos priedai > Ventiliatorių priedai: Lubų ventiliatorių strypai ir prailginimo strypai; Ventiliatoriaus mentės; Ventiliatorių tvirtinimo rinkiniai ir laikikliai; Ventiliatorių traukiamosios grandinės ir jungikliai; Ventiliatorių nuotolinio valdymo pultai; Apšvietimo sistemų komplektai
sv: Hem och trädgård > Tillbehör till hushållsapparater > Fläkttillbehör: Nedpendlingsrör och förlängningsrör för takfläktar; Fläktblad; Monteringssatser och fästen för fläktar; Dragkedjor och strömbrytare för fläktar; Fjärrkontroller för fläktar; Belysningssystemsatser
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsgeräte-Zubehör > Ventilatorenzubehör: Deckenventilator-Decken- und Verlängerungsstangen; Ventilatorflügel; Montagesets und Halterungen für Ventilatoren; Zugketten und Schalter für Ventilatoren; Ventilatoren-Fernbedienungen; Beleuchtungssystem-Sets